Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 13. Law Enforcement Use of Unmanned Aircraft Systems.

Sec. 18.65.900.
Use of unmanned aircraft systems.

Except as provided in AS

18.65.900

—

18.65.909

, a law enforcement agency may not use an unmanned aircraft system.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.65.901.
Operational requirements for unmanned aircraft systems.

A law enforcement agency shall adopt procedures for the use of unmanned aircraft systems. The procedures adopted under this section must require, at a minimum, that the law enforcement agency

obtain any authorization, permit, or certificate required by the Federal Aviation Administration to operate the unmanned aircraft system;

allow the unmanned aircraft system to be operated only by unmanned aircraft system pilots and crew members who have been trained and certified in the operation of the unmanned aircraft system and only under the supervision of officials trained in the policies and procedures governing the use of the unmanned aircraft system;

provide that the flight of an unmanned aircraft system be approved by the commissioner or deputy commissioner of public safety or the chief administrative officer of the law enforcement agency or the officer’s designee;

ensure that the flight of an unmanned aircraft system be for a public purpose;

maintain a record of each flight, including the time, date, and purpose of the flight, and the identity of the authorizing official;

establish an auditable flight record system, including the documentation of a change in a flight time record;

establish a method for notifying the public of the operation of an unmanned aircraft system, unless notifying the public would endanger the safety of a person;

provide for community involvement in the development of the policies required in this section, including the consideration of public comment.

In this section, “chief administrative officer” has the meaning given in AS

18.65.290

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.65.902.
Use of an unmanned aircraft system by a law enforcement agency.

A law enforcement agency may use an unmanned aircraft system

to gather evidence in a criminal investigation

under the express terms of a search warrant issued by a court; or

in accordance with a judicially recognized exception to the warrant requirement; or

in situations and for uses not involving a criminal investigation and not intended to lead to the production of evidence for use in a criminal investigation, if the use does not constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy and is consistent with the procedures in AS

18.65.901

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.65.903.
Retention of images.

A law enforcement agency may not retain images captured by an unmanned aircraft system unless retention of the image is required

as part of an investigation or prosecution;

for training purposes; or

by federal or state law or by municipal ordinance.

Images that may not be retained under (a) of this section are confidential and are not public records under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.65.909.
Definitions.

In AS

18.65.900

—

18.65.909

,

“law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in AS

12.36.090

;

“unmanned aircraft system” means an unmanned aircraft that is operated without direct human intervention from inside or on the aircraft and includes the associated support equipment, control station, data links, telemetry, communications, and navigation equipment necessary to operate the unmanned aircraft;

“unmanned aircraft system crew member” means a person other than an unmanned aircraft system pilot who is assigned to duties related to an unmanned aircraft system during flight;

“unmanned aircraft system pilot” means a person exercising control over an unmanned aircraft system during flight.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2014)